District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.32

Supplementary petitions.

(a)

As soon as possible after June 19, 1976, but in no case more than 5 days after such date, the Board shall:

(1)

Make available to any resident of a Commission area copies of petition forms for collecting signatures of registered qualified electors in such area; and

(2)

Publish in the District of Columbia Register, and post in conspicuous places in each Commission area, the number of registered qualified electors in such Commission area.

(b)

Upon certification by the Board to the Chairman of the Council that 5 percent of the registered qualified electors of a Commission area have signed a petition calling for the establishment of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission in such area, the Council shall then establish, by resolution, a nonpartisan elected Advisory Neighborhood Commission for such Commission area, with its members to be elected from the single-member districts established for such Commission area. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit an individual to sign more than 1 petition for the establishment of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission.

June 19, 1976, D.C. Law 1-72, § 3, 23 DCR 575

History

1981 Ed., § 1-266.
1973 Ed., § 1-171n.

Prior Codifications